Colorado, session 2026A, HB1394.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-5-504, amend (1)
as follows:
43-5-504. Motorcycle operator safety training fund - gifts,
donations, and grants - tuition benefit - rules - definitions.
(1) The motorcycle operator safety training fund is hereby created
in the state treasury. The fund consists of money collected under sections
42-2-114 (2)(d), 42-2-118 (1)(b)(II), and 42-3-304 (4). The money in the
fund is available immediately, without further appropriation, for allocation
by the chief to the office to be used SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE OFFICE MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE FUND
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

for the implementation and administration of the program. Money credited
to the fund remains in the fund at the end of each fiscal year and is not
transferred to any other fund.
SECTION 2. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$1,110,000 is appropriated to the department of public safety for use by the
Colorado state patrol. This appropriation is from the motorcycle operator
safety training fund created in section 43-5-504 (1), C.R.S. To implement
this act, the division may use this appropriation for the motorcycle operator
safety training program.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1394

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1394